Hawaii statutes.
§464-9 Applications for and certificates of
licensure; renewal; fees; continuing education. (a) Application for
licensure shall be made upon a form prescribed by the board and shall be signed
by the applicant. With each application there shall be paid to the board a
nonrefundable application fee.

For each examination, or repetition thereof in
whole or in part as shall be limited or permitted by the rules of the board,
the candidate shall pay to the board an examination fee; provided where the
candidate is eligible to take only that part of the examination pertaining to
engineering fundamentals the candidate shall pay the appropriate fee. The fee
paid shall not be refundable; provided if a candidate after having paid the fee
is unable for any reason beyond the candidate's control to participate in the
examination, the board may extend the time of the candidate's participation to
the next regular examination date and credit the candidate the amount of the
fee paid.

(b) Upon qualifying for licensure, the
applicant shall pay a license fee, and upon receipt thereof by the board shall
thereupon be licensed as a professional engineer, architect, land surveyor or
landscape architect, and shall receive a certificate thereof from the board
signed by the chairperson. Every person licensed who, as an individual or as a
member of a firm or corporation, conducts an office or other place of business
for the practice of the profession shall display the original certificate in a
conspicuous manner, in the principal office or place of business.

(c) Every license expires on April 30 of each
even-numbered year following its issuance and becomes invalid after that date
unless renewed. At least one month in advance of the date of expiration of the
license, a notice shall be mailed to every person licensed under this section
informing them of the date of expiration and the amount required for the
renewal. Licenses that have expired for failure to pay renewal fees on or
before the date required in this subsection may be restored within two years of
the expiration date upon payment of a fee for each renewal. Any person who
fails to restore the person's license within two years of the date of its
expiration shall reapply for licensure as a new applicant and meet the requirements
in effect at that time.

(d) The board shall require continuing education to
renew a license for architects effective as of the renewal date for a license
expiring on April 30, 2008, and for every biennial renewal period thereafter.
All continuing education courses shall be relevant to public protection
subjects and shall be approved by the board as provided in the board's rules;
provided that:

(1) Architects initially licensed in the
first year of the biennium shall have completed eight continuing education
credit hours;

(2) Architects initially licensed in the
second year of the biennium shall not be required to complete any continuing
education credit hours;

(3) All other architects shall have
completed sixteen continuing education credit hours;

(4) The board shall randomly audit an
architect's continuing education courses, and shall establish guidelines for
random audits in rules adopted in accordance with chapter 91;

(5) An architect whose license is not
renewed because of failure to comply with the continuing education requirement
shall have two years from the expiration date of the license to restore the
license by complying with all applicable continuing professional education
requirements and paying the appropriate renewal and penalty fees. After the
two-year restoration period, the licensee shall be required to apply as a new
applicant, and meet the requirements in effect at that time; and

(6) An architect licensee shall not be
subject to the continuing education requirement if the architect otherwise
meets all other renewal requirements and:

(A) Is a member of the armed forces, National
Guard, or a reserve component on active duty and deployed during a state or
national crisis as "state or national crisis" is defined in chapter
436B;

(B) Is ill or disabled for a
significant period of time as documented by a licensed physician, and is unable
to meet the continuing education requirements of this subsection;

(C) Can demonstrate undue hardship that
prevented the licensee from meeting the continuing education requirements of
this subsection; or

(D) Is retired from the practice of
architecture and is no longer performing or providing architectural services;

provided that any exemption from the continuing
education requirements shall be subject to the board's approval. [L 1923, c
227, pt of §4; RL 1925, pt of §3686; am L 1927, c 225, §1; am L 1931, c 165, pt
of §2; RL 1935, pt of §7037; RL 1945, pt of §7609; am L 1949, c 306, pt of §4;
RL 1955, §166-9; am L 1961, c 142, §12(b), (c); am L 1965, c 243, §1; HRS
§464-9; am L 1970, c 85, §1; am L 1974, c 28, §1; am L 1975, c 118, §28; am L
1983, c 155, §5; am L 1984, c 7, §71; am L 1988, c 226, §6; am L 1989, c 210,
§11; am L 1992, c 202, §§155, 156; gen ch 1992; am L 1993, c 127, §1; am L 1997,
c 8, §3 and c 40, §18; am L 2005, c 2, §2]

Cross References

Disposal of examination papers, see §94-5.

Professional testing services, see §26-9.

Case Notes

Failure of architect to renew registration does not warrant
forfeiture of the benefits of the architect's contracts if forfeiture would be
wholly out of proportion to requirements of public policy or appropriate
punishment. 57 H. 124, 551 P.2d 525 (1976).

Provision for renewal not for public protection but for
revenue. 57 H. 124, 551 P.2d 525 (1976).

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next